Illinois, session 104th, HB5232.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-151.1 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/6-151.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 6-151.1)7    Sec. 6-151.1. The General Assembly finds and declares that 8service in the Fire Department requires that firemen, in times 9of stress and danger, must perform unusual tasks; that by 10reason of their occupation, firemen are subject to exposure to 11great heat and to extreme cold in certain seasons while in 12performance of their duties; that by reason of their 13employment firemen are required to work in the midst of and are 14subject to heavy smoke fumes and carcinogenic, poisonous, 15toxic or chemical gases from fires; and that in the course of 16their rescue and paramedic duties firemen are exposed to 17disabling infectious diseases, including AIDS, hepatitis C, 18and stroke. The General Assembly further finds and declares 19that all the aforementioned conditions exist and arise out of 20or in the course of such employment.21    Any active fireman who has completed 7 or more years of 22service and is unable to perform his duties in the Fire 23Department by reason of heart disease, tuberculosis, breast   HB5232- 2 -LRB104 20213 RPS 33664 b1cancer, any disease of the lungs or respiratory tract, AIDS, 2hepatitis C, stroke, or a contagious staph infection, 3including methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus (MRSA), 4resulting from his service as a fireman, shall be entitled to 5receive an occupational disease disability benefit during any 6period of such disability for which he does not have a right to 7receive salary.8    Any active fireman who has completed 7 or more years of 9service and is unable to perform his duties in the fire 10department by reason of a disabling cancer, which develops or 11manifests itself during a period while the fireman is in the 12service of the department, shall be entitled to receive an 13occupational disease disability benefit during any period of 14such disability for which he does not have a right to receive 15salary. In order to receive this occupational disease 16disability benefit, the type of cancer involved must be a type 17which may be caused by exposure to heat, radiation or a known 18carcinogen as defined by the International Agency for Research 19on Cancer.20    Any fireman receiving a retirement annuity shall be 21entitled to an occupational disease disability benefit under 22this Section if the fireman (1) has not reached the age of 23compulsory retirement, (2) has not been receiving a retirement 24annuity for more than 5 years, and (3) has a condition that 25would have qualified the fireman for an occupational disease 26disability benefit under this Section if he or she was an   HB5232- 3 -LRB104 20213 RPS 33664 b1active fireman. A fireman who receives an occupational disease 2disability benefit in accordance with this paragraph may not 3receive a retirement annuity during the period in which he or 4she receives an occupational disease disability benefit. The 5occupational disease disability benefit shall terminate upon 6the fireman reaching the age of compulsory retirement. 7    Any fireman who shall enter the service after the 8effective date of this amendatory Act shall be examined by one 9or more practicing physicians appointed by the Board, and if 10that examination discloses impairment of the heart, lungs, or 11respiratory tract, or the existence of AIDS, hepatitis C, 12stroke, cancer, or a contagious staph infection, including 13methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus (MRSA), then the 14fireman shall not be entitled to receive an occupational 15disease disability benefit unless and until a subsequent 16examination reveals no such impairment, AIDS, hepatitis C, 17stroke, cancer, or contagious staph infection, including 18methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus (MRSA).19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 20contrary, if a fireman receiving an occupational disease 21disability benefit dies on or after the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the fireman's 23surviving spouse may elect, in a manner prescribed by the 24Board, to receive the deceased fireman's occupational disease 25disability benefit in lieu of the widow's annuity or Tier 2 26surviving spouse annuity, whichever is applicable. The   HB5232- 4 -LRB104 20213 RPS 33664 b1surviving spouse's eligibility for the deceased fireman's 2occupational disease disability benefit shall be the same as 3the eligibility for the widow's annuity or Tier 2 surviving 4spouse annuity, whichever is applicable. Notwithstanding 5Section 1-103.1, the changes made to this Section by this 6amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly apply without 7regard to whether the deceased fireman was in service on or 8after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 9General Assembly. 10    The occupational disease disability benefit shall be 65% 11of the fireman's salary at the time of his removal from the 12Department payroll. However, beginning January 1, 1994, no 13occupational disease disability benefit that has been payable 14under this Section for at least 10 years shall be less than 50% 15of the current salary attached from time to time to the rank 16and grade held by the fireman at the time of his removal from 17the Department payroll, regardless of whether that removal 18occurred before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 191993.20    Such fireman also shall have a right to receive child's 21disability benefit of $30 per month on account of each 22unmarried child who is less than 18 years of age or 23handicapped, dependent upon the fireman for support, and 24either the issue of the fireman or legally adopted by him. The 25total amount of child's disability benefit payable to the 26fireman, when added to his occupational disease disability   HB5232- 5 -LRB104 20213 RPS 33664 b1benefit, shall not exceed 75% of the amount of salary which he 2was receiving at the time of the grant of occupational disease 3disability benefit.4    The first payment of occupational disease disability 5benefit or child's disability benefit shall be made not later 6than one month after the benefit is granted. Each subsequent 7payment shall be made not later than one month after the date 8of the latest payment.9    Occupational disease disability benefit shall be payable 10during the period of the disability until the fireman reaches 11the age of compulsory retirement. Child's disability benefit 12shall be paid to such a fireman during the period of disability 13until such child or children attain age 18 or marry, whichever 14event occurs first; except that attainment of age 18 by a child 15who is so physically or mentally handicapped as to be 16dependent upon the fireman for support, shall not render the 17child ineligible for child's disability benefit. The fireman 18thereafter shall receive such annuity or annuities as are 19provided for him in accordance with other provisions of this 20Article.21(Source: P.A. 104-284, eff. 8-15-25.) 22    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 23Section 8.50 as follows: 24    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)  HB5232- 6 -LRB104 20213 RPS 33664 b1    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 28 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 3the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 4Act of the 104th General Assembly.